Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 5. Manner of Service Generally

§§ 811-813.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 814.
Partnerships and unincorporated associations—suit in firm name; service of process.

A partnership or an unincorporated association or joint stock company may sue and be sued in its firm, associate, or company name and service of process against such partnership, association, or company made upon any officer, a managing or general agent, a superintendent, any member thereof, or any agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of process, shall have the same force and effect as regards the joint rights, property, and effects of the partnership, association, or company as if served upon all the partners, associates, or shareholders.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 261

, § 9.

§ 815.
Nonabatement on change in officers or members.

Such cause shall not abate by reason of the death, removal, or resignation of the president, other principal officer, clerk, or treasurer, or by the death or legal incapacity of any such partner, associate, or shareholder, or by reason of any change in the membership of such partnership, association, or company during the pendency of such cause.

§ 816.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.